Hawaii statutes.
§54-57 Construction, additions, extensions,
increases, betterments, and improvements. The board of water supply shall
locate and determine the character and type of all construction and additions,
extensions, increases, betterments, and improvements to waterworks and water
systems, and shall determine the policy for the construction or the making of
such additions, extensions, increases, betterments, and improvements out of
public funds under its jurisdiction. [L 1949, c 86, §7; RL 1955, §146-106; HRS §54-57]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next